Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1303
State Real Estate Commission; administer sections; advisory group.

(1) The provisions of sections 76-1301 to 76-1315 shall be administered by the State Real Estate Commission.

(2) All rules, regulations and administrative procedures adopted by the agency pursuant to sections 76-1301 to 76-1315 shall be promulgated with the advice and counsel of a representative group of administrative personnel of those retirement communities and subdivisions affected by such rules, regulations and administrative practices.

Laws 1972, LB 1311, § 3.